Oklahoma, session 2025, SB385.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:

SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1836, is

amended to read as follows:

Section 1836. Any person, firm or officer, representative, or

agent of any firm or corporation, who shall execute and deliver, or

who shall file for record or cause to be recorded in the office of

any county clerk of any county in this state, any deed or other

instrument in writing purporting to convey any right, title, or

interest, or right to possession in and to any real estate situated

in such county, to which the grantor, or grantors, therein did not

have and hold a bona fide color of title, and any such person who

shall file or cause to be filed for record in such office any such

Req. No. 27 Page 1

deed or other instrument which clouds the title of any real estate

allotted to any member of one of the Five Civilized Tribes, or to

the Osage Tribe of Indians Nation, as a homestead, prior to the

removal of the restrictions thereon by operation of law, or

otherwise, knowing the land conveyed to be restricted homestead

lands, shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor, and, upon

conviction, shall be punished by a fine not to exceed One Hundred

Dollars ($100.00) Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), and by

imprisonment in the county jail for a period not to exceed thirty

(30) days ninety (90) days, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.



60-1-27 TEK 1/14/2025 3:50:50 PM























Req. No. 27 Page 2